District of Columbia statutes.
9-1108.02

Applicability.

Section 9-1108.01(b) shall apply upon:

(1)

Enactment by Congress of legislation providing federal grants to the Washington Metropolitan Area Transit Authority for the purpose of maintaining and improving the transportation system of the Washington Metropolitan Area Transit Authority;

(2)

Passage of legislation by the Maryland General Assembly and the Virginia General Assembly:

(A)

If each jurisdiction dedicates an amount of revenue at least equal to the contribution of the District to the Washington Metropolitan Area Transit Authority as provided under this subchapter; or

(B)

Implementing any act of Congress providing federal grants to the Washington Metropolitan Area Transit Authority for the purpose of maintaining and improving the transportation system of the Washington Metropolitan Area Transit Authority; and

(3)

Repealed;

(4)

Inclusion of the fiscal effect of this subchapter in an approved budget and financial plan.

June 16, 2006, D.C. Law 16-132, § 3, 53 DCR 4727
Mar. 25, 2009, D.C. Law 17-360, § 3(b), 56 DCR 1200
Mar. 3, 2010, D.C. Law 18-111, §§ 6071(b), 7032, 57 DCR 181
D.C. Law 17-360 repealed par. (3) which had read as follows: “(3) Inclusion of the fiscal effect of this subchapter in an approved budget and financial plan.”
D.C. Law 18-111, in the introductory text, substituted “ Section 9-1108.01(b)” for “ Section 9-1108.01”; and added par. (4).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 6071(b) of Fiscal Year 2010 Budget Support Second Emergency Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-207, October 15, 2009, 56 DCR 8234).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 6071(b) of Fiscal Year Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-260, January 4, 2010, 57 DCR 345).

Section 3(3) of Law 16-132 required that the fiscal effect of Law 16-132 be included in an approved budget and financial plan in order for Law 16-132 to apply as law. The Budget Director of the Council of the District of Columbia has determined, as of November 2, 2007, that the fiscal effect of Law 16-132 has not been included in an approved budget and financial plan. Therefore, the provisions of this section, enacted by Law 16-98, are not in effect.

Section 3(b) of D.C. Law 17-360 repealed section 3(3) of D.C. Law 16-132 and restored this section.